Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 6.4
ACQUISITION OF CONTROL OF BANKS AND
BANK HOLDING COMPANIES

11-6.4-101 to 11-6.4-104. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article repealed, p. 1051, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1988. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 2003, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.